North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 62B. Spirituous Liquor Advisory Council.

§ 106-755.10.
North Carolina Spirituous Liquor Advisory Council established.

The Commissioner shall appoint a North Carolina Spirituous Liquor Advisory Council (Council) to consist of individuals who have education or experience in the spirituous liquor industry or in the field of tourism. The membership shall be comprised of members of the spirituous liquor industry in North Carolina, at least one representative of the North Carolina Restaurant and Lodging Association, at least one representative of the North Carolina Association of ABC Boards, at least one representative of the ABC Commission, and any other person selected by the Commissioner. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Council members shall receive no salary, per diem, subsistence, travel reimbursement, or other stipend or reimbursement as a result of serving on the Council.

History.

2021-150, s. 5.1.

§ 106-755.11.
Powers and duties of the Council.

The Council shall have all of the following powers and duties:

To identify and implement methods for improving North Carolina’s rank as a spirituous liquor-producing State.

To assure orderly growth and development of North Carolina’s spirituous liquor industry.

To increase public awareness of the quality of North Carolina spirituous liquor.

To coordinate the interaction of North Carolina’s spirituous liquor industry with other segments of the State’s economy such as tourism, retail trade, and horticulture.

To conduct methods of quality assurance of North Carolina’s spirituous liquor industry to create a sound foundation for further growth.

To assist in the coordination of the activities of the various State agencies and other organizations contributing to the development of the spirituous liquor industry.

To enter into agreements with any local, State, or national organizations or agencies engaged in education for the purpose of disseminating information on spirituous liquor projects.

To develop a plan that identifies problems and constraints of the spirituous liquor industry, proposes solutions to those problems, and delineates planning mechanisms for the orderly growth of the industry.

To render advice and recommendations, including legislative recommendations, to the Commissioner regarding all of the above powers and duties.

History.

2021-150, s. 5.1.